Hawaii statutes.
§149A-33 Rules. The department shall
have the authority to carry out and effectuate the purpose of this chapter by
rules, including but not limited to the following:

(1) To establish fees, procedures, conditions, and
standards to certify persons for the use of restricted use pesticides under
section 4 of FIFRA;

(2) To establish limitations and conditions for the
application of pesticides by aircraft, power rigs, mist blowers, and other
equipment;

(3) To establish, as necessary, specific standards
and guidelines which specify those conditions which constitute unreasonable
adverse effects on the environment;

(4) To establish, as necessary, record keeping
requirements for pesticide use by applicators; and

(5) To establish, as necessary, procedures for the
issuance of guidelines to specify those conditions that constitute use of a
pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its label. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am
L 1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 88, §2; am L 1987, c 310, §17]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next